Connecticut, session 2026, HB05419.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section:
(1) "Department" means the Department of Children and Families;
(2) "Postsecondary education program" means any program that
leads to an academic degree or certification in a vocation or employment
training; and
(3) "Postsecondary education funding programs" means the program
set forth in department policy (A) 28-1 under which the department
funds the postsecondary education of a youth who is committed to the
department, remains committed at the age of eighteen and meets the
requirements established by the department in its policies and
regulations, and (B) 25-2 under which the department funds the
postsecondary education of a youth who has been adopted on or before
LCO No. 1910 1 of 2

Raised Bill No. 5419
such youth's eighteenth birthday and meets the requirements
established by the department in its policies and regulations.
(b) The Commissioner of Children and Families shall amend the
department policies and regulations regarding the postsecondary
education funding programs to provide an extension of time for the
qualification under such programs of any youth whose postsecondary
education was disrupted by the COVID-19 pandemic. Nothing in this
section shall be construed to require the department to continue
providing case management services for any youth who begins
receiving funding under the postsecondary education funding
programs when such youth is older than twenty-one years of age.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 New section